New Jersey, session 222, S1556.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2002, c.101 (C.56:11-42) is amended to read as follows: 1.    No retail sales establishment shall print electronically more than the last five digits of a customer's credit card or debit card account number or the expiration date of that credit or debit card upon any sales receipt either provided at the point of sale to the customer or retained by the retail sales establishment, except that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any sales receipt in which the sole means of recording the customer's credit card or debit card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit or debit card. A violation of this section shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not more than $1,000, which shall be collected and enforced through summary proceedings pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2002, c.101, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the 13th month next following enactment.